DIAGNOSTICS

ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKEBOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI-343

DI3RQ-01

DTC C 1242 /42

IG2 Power Source Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
) . . . . * Battery
With the vehicle running, open in IG2 is detected for more
C1242/42 «ICregulator
than 7 secs. L
» Power source circuit

Fail safe function:

If trouble occurs in the power source circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits

ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

@

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG2 power souce.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe voltage condition output from the ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

ON GND 162 PREPARATION: |
@ / / GND Remove ABS ECU with connectors still connected.
\ CHECK:

JLTAF LI, (@) Turn the ignition switch ON.

ECU connector.
OK:
) Voltage: 10 - 14V

@ (s a 1| (b) Measure voltage between terminals 1G2 and GND of ABS

ECU.

F04453
0K> Ignition switch OFF, check and replace ABS
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3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS ECU connector and body
ground.

LOCK GND CHECK:
/ \ Measure resistance between terminal GND of ABS ECU con-

VT EEEE] u| |L|vﬂJ nector and body ground.
EREEEERN OK:
Resistance: 1 Q or less

F04452

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

4 Check IGN fuse.

PREPARATION:
Dg"er’s Side Remove IGN fuse from driver’s side J/B.
J CHECK:

Check continuity of IGN fuse.

OK:

oo\ Continuity
0000Nga00 l/
00000500

L

components connected to IGN fuse (See at-

F04449 NG Check for short circuit in all the harness and
tached wiring diagram).

@

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS ECU and battery.
(See page IN-24)
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